Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3138
Tax credit; application; approval; certificate.

(1) If the department determines that an application is complete and that the eligible taxpayer qualifies for tax credits under the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act, the department shall approve the application and issue a tax credit certificate to the eligible taxpayer. The certificate shall include the following information:

(a) An identification number for the certificate;

(b) The date of issuance for the certificate; and

(c) The amount of the tax credit allowed under the act for the eligible taxpayer.

(2) The department shall consider and approve applications for tax credits under the act in the order in which the applications are received.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 18.